Washington statutes.
RCW 36.24.070

Verdict of jury.

After hearing the testimony, the jury shall render its verdict and certify the same in writing signed by the jurors, and setting forth who the person killed is, if known, and when, where and by what means he or she came to his or her death; or if he or she was killed, or his or her death was occasioned by the act of another by criminal means, who is guilty thereof, if known.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4034; 1963 c 4 s 36.24.070. Prior: 1953 c 188 s 4; Code 1881 s 2782; 1863 p 560 s 8; 1854 p 437 s 8; RRS s 4187.]